Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.250

Participation in federal nutrition programs—Superintendent's duties.

The superintendent of public instruction shall aggressively solicit eligible schools, child and adult day care centers, and other organizations to participate in the nutrition programs authorized by the United States department of agriculture.

[ 1991 c 366 s 402.]

NOTES:

Finding—1991 c 366: "Hunger and malnutrition threaten the future of a whole generation of children in Washington. Children who are hungry or malnourished are unable to function optimally in the classroom and are thus at risk of lower achievement in school. The resultant diminished future capacity of and opportunities for these children will affect this state's economic and social future. Thus, the legislature finds that the state has an interest in helping families provide nutritious meals to children.

The legislature also finds that the state has an interest in helping hungry and malnourished adults obtain necessary nourishment. Adequate nourishment is necessary for physical health, and physical health is the foundation of self-sufficiency. Adequate nourishment is especially critical in the case of pregnant and lactating women, both to ensure that all mothers and babies are as healthy as possible and to minimize the costs associated with the care of low-birthweight babies." [ 1991 c 366 s 1.]

Finding—1991 c 366: "The legislature finds that the school breakfast and lunch programs, the summer feeding program, and the child and adult day care feeding programs authorized by the United States department of agriculture are effective in addressing unmet nutritional needs. However, some communities in the state do not participate in these programs. The result is hunger, malnutrition, and inadequate nutrition education for otherwise eligible persons living in nonparticipating communities." [ 1991 c 366 s 401.]

Parts and headings not law—1991 c 366: "Parts and headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law." [ 1991 c 366 s 502.]

Severability—1991 c 366: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 c 366 s 503.]

Effective date—1991 c 366: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1991 c 366 s 504.]